Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [626.881] SURPLUS BADGES. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding section 15.054 or 471.3459, a chief law enforcement officer may provide at no cost a surplus badge used by a peace officer, to: new text end new text begin (1) the person to whom the badge had been issued when the person was initially hired or during the course of the person's employment. The person may be currently employed or retired. The person must be in good standing or have retired from the agency in good standing; or new text end new text begin (2) the spouse or child of a deceased peace officer. new text end new text begin (b) A surplus badge provided under this section is decommissioned and may not be used by a peace officer in the performance of their duties. new text end new text begin (c) For purposes of this section, "surplus badge" means a badge that bears any seal before May 11, 2026, or the badge of a person who is retired bearing any seal. new text end